Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.130

Failure to pay or complete community restitution—Penalty.

(1) Failure to pay a monetary penalty assessed by a court under the provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Failure to complete community restitution ordered by a court under the provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2002 c 175 s 4; 1987 c 380 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.